District of Columbia statutes.
3-412

Claim of human remains — Funeral services establishment entitled; settlement of disputed claims.

The funeral services establishment retained by the person authorized pursuant to § 3-413 shall be entitled to take possession of human remains. In the event that 2 or more establishments differ as to their legal right to take possession of human remains, they shall refer the matter to the Mayor or his or her designee for a decision.

History

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 13, 31 DCR 1815
May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-129, § 2(a), 43 DCR 1568

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2812.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-84, see Mayor’s Order 87-186, August 3, 1987.